District of Columbia statutes.
44-415

Certificate of need mandatory condition precedent.

The issuance of a certificate of need, if required under this chapter, shall be a condition precedent to the issuance of any license, permit, and any other type of official approval, except zoning approval, by an agency or officer or employee of the District government which is necessary for a particular health project.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-191, § 16, 43 DCR 4535
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 18, 45 DCR 745

History

1981 Ed., § 32-365.

Prior Codifications